North Carolina, session 2025, HB518.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 143-129.11. Request for proposals for publication of notices.
(a) Annually, at the start of each fiscal year, a contract for publication of notices by units
of local government and local school administrative units shall be made after informal bids have
been secured. The informal bid process shall be designed to maximize competition among
eligible newspapers while ensuring the best value for public funds.
(b) All contracts under this section shall be awarded to the lowest responsible, responsive
bidder, taking into consideration quality, performance, circulation reach, cost, and compliance
with Article 50 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes.
(c) It shall be the duty of any officer, department, board, local school administrative unit,
or commission entering into such contract to keep a record of all informal bids submitted, and
such record shall not be subject to public inspection until the contract has been awarded.
(d) If there is no eligible newspaper for the unit of local government or local school
administrative unit, the contract for publication of notices shall be awarded to an eligible
newspaper as described in G.S. 1-597(b) or G.S. 1-599.
(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Local school administrative unit. – As defined in G.S. 115C-5.
(2) Newspaper. – As described in G.S. 1-597(a).
(3) Publish, publication, and other forms of the verb "to publish." – As defined in
G.S. 153A-1, 159-1, and 160A-1.
(4) Unit of local government. – As defined in G.S. 159-7."
SECTION 2. G.S. 1-596 reads as rewritten:
"§ 1-596. Charges for legal advertising.
(a) The publication of all advertising required by law to be made in newspapers in this
State shall be paid for at not to exceed the local commercial rate of the newspapers selected. Any
public or municipal officer or board created by or existing under the laws of this State that is now
or may hereafter be authorized by law to enter into contracts for the publication of legal
advertisements is hereby authorized to pay therefor prices not exceeding said rates.pay in
accordance with the contract entered into under G.S. 143-129.11.
*H518-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) No newspaper in this State shall accept or print any legal advertising until said
newspaper shall have first filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which it is
published a sworn statement of its current commercial rate for the several classes of advertising
regularly carried by said publication, and any owner or manager of a newspaper violating the
provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to notices
published on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 518-First Edition